North Carolina, session 2025, HB582.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the "Providing Relief to Impacted Families
Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105‑449.106(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Nonprofits. – A nonprofit organization listed below that purchases and uses motor
fuel may receive a quarterly refund, for the excise tax paid during the preceding quarter, at a rate
equal to the tax rate in effect under G.S. 105-449.80 for the time period for which the refund is
claimed, less one cent (1¢) per gallon.
Any of the following entities may receive a refund under this subsection:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 2002-108, s. 13, effective January 1, 2003.
(2) A private, nonprofit organization that transports passengers under contract
with or at the express designation of a unit of local government.
(3) A volunteer fire department.
(4) A volunteer rescue squad.
(5) A sheltered workshop recognized by the Department of Health and Human
Services.
(6) A nonprofit organization transporting food for free distribution to residents of
this State."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H582-v-1*